Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-1122.01
Federal limits rejected.

The federal limits on the registration of securities, dealers, brokers, broker-dealers, agents, and investment advisers as provided in the federal Philanthropy Protection Act of 1995, Public Law 104-62, shall not apply in Nebraska and are hereby rejected by the State of Nebraska pursuant to section 6(c) of such act. The State of Nebraska elects to retain the authority to require or not require such registration under the Securities Act of Nebraska and to retain the authority to have such registration requirements apply in all administrative and judicial actions commenced after July 15, 1998.

Laws 1998, LB 1180, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB148, § 19.